dictsource/bof_rules
// Bété pronunciation rules
// Letter-to-phoneme rules for Bété (Daloa)

.L01 a e i o u

.group a
        a        a

.group b
        b        b

.group d
        d        d

.group e
        e        e

.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g
        gh       g

.group i
        i        i

.group k
        k        k
        kp       kp

.group l
        l        l

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n

.group o
        o        o

.group p
        p        p

.group r
        r        r

.group s
        s        s

.group t
        t        t

.group u
        u        u

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w

.group y
        y        j

.group z
        z        z

.group -
        -        _-
